Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-521
Automobile liability policy; no liability on director or others furnishing information.

There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against, the Director of Insurance or against any insurer, its authorized representative, its agents, its employees, or any firm, person, or corporation furnishing to the insurer information as to reasons for cancellation or intention not to renew, for any statement made by any of them in any written notice of cancellation or intention not to renew, or in any other communication, oral or written, specifying the reasons for cancellation or intention not to renew, or the providing of information pertaining thereto, or for statements made or evidence submitted at any hearings conducted in connection therewith.

Laws 1972, LB 1396, § 8.